Ohio, session 136, HB787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That Section 423.190 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly be amended to read as follows: Sec. 423.190. CHILD CARE CHOICE VOUCHER PROGRAM (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item, 830604, Child Care, a portion in each fiscal year, along with $50,000,000 in each fiscal year in appropriation item 830605, TANF Block Grant, shall be used by the Department of Children and Youth to establish and administer the Child Care Choice Voucher Program. Subject to available funds, the program shall provide support, in the form of vouchers, to families to assist them with child care costs. To be eligible to participate in the program, a family must meet all of the following conditions: (1) The caretaker parent is employed or participating in a program of education or training for an amount of time reasonably related to the time that the parent's children are receiving child care. (2) The family does not meet the income conditions for initial eligibility under the Publicly Funded Child Care Program administered by the Department as described in section 5104.30 of the Revised Code, but the maximum amount of the family's income does not exceed two four hundred percent of the federal poverty line. (3) The family meets any other condition established by the Department. (B) In providing vouchers under this section, both of the following apply: (1) The program shall utilize, not later than November 1, 2026, the publicly funded child care payment rates established in section 5104.30 of the Revised Code, except that such payment rates shall not be enhanced payment rates as described in division (E)(2)(c) of that section. (2) If a participating family uses its voucher at a type A family child care home or licensed type B family child care home, the program shall not require the family child care home to be rated through the Step Up to Quality Program administered by the Department as described in section 5104.29 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing Section 423.190 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly is hereby repealed.